Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.205

State policy.

It is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage every eligible person to register to vote and to participate fully in all elections, and to protect the integrity of the electoral process by providing equal access to the process while guarding against discrimination and fraud. The election registration laws and the voting laws of the state of Washington must be administered without discrimination based upon race, creed, color, national origin, sex, or political affiliation.

[ 2003 c 111 s 132; 2001 c 41 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.04.001.]